Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4411
Child welfare system; legislative findings and intent.

(1) The Legislature finds that the State of Nebraska, in order to support the well-being, permanency, and safety of children and families in Nebraska's communities, needs to comprehensively transform its child welfare system. The Legislature further finds that this comprehensive transformation will require an integrated model addressing all aspects of the system and strong partnerships among the legislative, executive, and judicial branches of government and community stakeholders.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to:

(a) Establish an intersectoral child welfare practice model work group;

(b) Establish appropriate strategic leadership and guidance for practice and finance model development from across the three branches of government; and

(c) Appropriate funds for contractual support to build the practice and finance model for Nebraska.

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 1.